Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 4. State Oil and Gas Leases

§ 531.
Management of State oil and gas resources.

The management of State oil and gas resources shall be undertaken to accomplish the following goals:

provide for the timely leasing, exploration, discovery, assessment, and development of oil and gas resources which may be found on State lands;

provide the State and its citizens an adequate economic return on State oil and gas resources if discovered in commercially valuable quantities;

encourage competition among oil and gas developers by the use of appropriate competitive bidding and leasing procedures in the granting of exploration and development rights;

provide for a program of development that will facilitate sound planning by both developers and all levels of government;

give due consideration to the protection of the State’s diverse natural, cultural, and social resources.

Each State land manager shall be responsible for management of the leasing, exploration, and development of the oil and gas resources found on State lands under the manager’s primary jurisdiction.

Each State land manager shall adopt a written statement of objectives, policies, procedures, and a program to guide the development of the State’s oil and gas resources. Biennially, each State land manager and the Board shall prepare and submit to the General Assembly a proposed four-year oil and gas leasing and management program and a report on all leasing and management activities undertaken during the preceding two years. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection. Managers may elect to collaborate on a joint program of planning, leasing, and reporting to fulfill the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982; amended

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. June 8, 2004;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 45.

§ 532.
State oil and gas leases authorized.

State land managers may execute oil and gas leases and other related contracts for lands under their jurisdiction. The leases and contracts shall be upon terms and conditions which the manager finds most beneficial to the interests of the State.

When a State land manager proposes to lease State lands for oil and gas purposes, he or she shall notify the Board and forward a copy of the proposed lease. The Board shall review and comment on the terms of the proposed lease and shall specify additional terms and conditions necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Each State land manager shall require, as a condition to the issuance of any oil and gas lease that the lessee make available to the Board all exploration and production information, logs, and records resulting from operations under the lease. Such information shall be held confidential; provided, however, that the State Geologist shall have access to this information.

State oil and gas leases may be assigned only with the written consent and approval of the State land manager having jurisdiction.

All proceeds from State leases or other related contracts shall be paid into the General Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 533.
Notice of intention to lease State lands.

At least 30 days before he or she intends to lease State lands, the State land manager shall give public notice of his or her intention by commencing publication in two newspapers of general circulation, one in Montpelier and one where the lands or the greater portion thereof are situated.

Publication shall be made in newspapers of record approved by the Secretary of State.

If the notice is published in a daily newspaper there shall be at least five days from the first to the last day of publication, both days included; and if a weekly newspaper, the notice shall appear on at least two different days of publication.

In addition to the publication required by subdivision (1) of this subsection, the notice shall be published on a weekly basis in selected newspapers in the State as determined by the Secretary of State.

The notice shall include a description of the State lands, either as a tract or by parcels, and a statement that the terms and conditions of the offered lease may be obtained at a designated office of the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April, 28, 1982.

§ 534.
Gas produced from State lands.

All State oil and gas leases shall provide that the Board may require the lessee to dedicate all the natural gas produced from State lands for the use and benefit of the people of the State.

If the Board determines that it would benefit the people of the State to so dedicate the natural gas, the Board may arrange for the sale of natural gas for the use of the people of the State, or arrange for the exchange of the natural gas produced with producers of natural gas from other lands if the exchange will benefit the people of the State.

If the Board determines the dedication would not be in the public interest, or would cause waste, or would unreasonably deny the lessee the opportunity to economically market the natural gas, it may waive dedication.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 535.
State reservation of oil, gas, and minerals.

Each agricultural, timber, or other lease of any surface interest in state lands, and each mineral lease not for oil and gas purposes, shall reserve to the State all oil, gas, and other minerals not intended to be leased, and the right to drill and operate oil and gas wells on the premises and the easement, use, and right of way to enter upon and fully enjoy the rights reserved in this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.